Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5959.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 601d. (1) A person who commits a moving violation while operating a vehicle upon on a highway or other place open to the general public, including, but not limited to, an area designated for the parking of motor vehicles, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 1 year or a fine of not more than $2,000.00, or both, if the moving violation was the proximate cause of the death of another person. (2) A person who commits a moving violation while operating a vehicle upon on a highway or other place open to the general public, including, but not limited to, an area designated for the parking of motor vehicles, that causes serious impairment of a body function to another person is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 93 days or a fine of not more than $500.00, $750.00 for a first offense and not more than $1,000.00 for a second or subsequent offense, or both. (3) In addition to the penalties prescribed under subsection (2), if an individual is convicted of a violation of subsection (2), all of the following apply: (a) The secretary of state shall issue the individual a restricted license under section 319 for a period of not less than 1 year. (b) The court shall order the individual to successfully complete a court-approved driver improvement course or remedial driving program. On proof of successful completion of the court-approved driver improvement course or remedial driving program, 1 point shall be removed from the individual's driving record. (4) If a person is convicted of a second violation of subsection (2) within 7 years, the secretary of state shall suspend the individual's operator's or chauffeur's license for 2 years. The individual is not eligible for a restricted license during the suspension period. (5) (3) This section does not prohibit the person from being charged with, convicted of, or punished for any other violation of law. (6) (4) As used in this section, "moving violation" means an act or omission prohibited under this act or a local ordinance substantially corresponding to this act that involves the operation of a motor vehicle, and for which a fine may be assessed. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.